District of Columbia statutes.
7-2361.06

No effect on credentialing and privileging.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this chapter does not affect the credentialing or privileging standards of a health facility and does not preclude a health facility from waiving or modifying those standards while an emergency declaration is in effect.

(b)

The Mayor may issue rules, pursuant to § 7-2361.09, establishing credentialing standards applicable while an emergency declaration is in effect.

(c)

For the purposes of this section, the term:

(1)

“Credentialing” means obtaining, verifying, and assessing the qualifications of a health practitioner to provide treatment, care, or services in or for a health facility.

(2)

“Privileging” means the authorizing by an appropriate authority, such as a governing body, of a health practitioner to provide specific treatment, care, or services at a health facility subject to limits based on factors that include:

(A)

License;

(B)

Education;

(C)

Training;

(D)

Experience;

(E)

Competence;

(F)

Health status; and

(G)

Specialized skill.

July 1, 2010, D.C. Law 18-184, § 7, 57 DCR 3655
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 7 of the Uniform Emergency Volunteer Health Practitioners Act.